Utah statutes.
78B-6-905.   Sales -- When debt due in installments.

If the debt for which the mortgage, lien, or encumbrance is held is not all due, then as soon as sufficient of the property has been sold to pay the amount due, with costs, the sale must cease.  As often as more becomes due on principal or interest, the court may, on motion, order more to be sold.  If the property cannot be sold in portions without injury to the parties, the entire parcel may be ordered sold and the entire debt and costs paid.  There shall be a rebate of interest where a rebate is proper.

